Tennessee, session 114, SB0537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-1-101, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Guide" means a person who accepts compensation for assisting persons
who hunt, fish, or trap, and who is required to possess a guide license issued pursuant
to § 70-2-227;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 2, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
70-2-227.
The commission shall:
(1) Create and issue guide licenses for persons who work as guides at
Reelfoot Lake, located in Lake and Obion Counties; and
(2) Promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section, including
rules to require Reelfoot-specific guides to demonstrate relevant knowledge of
Reelfoot Lake and its inherent hazards. Such rules shall be promulgated in
- 2 - 001707

accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4,
chapter 5.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001707